zh-CN: 适用处理器系列: AMD A; AMD 速龙; AMD 速龙 FX; AMD 速龙 II; AMD 速龙 II X2; AMD 速龙 II X3; AMD 速龙 II X4; AMD 速龙 II 双核; AMD 速龙 MP; AMD 速龙 X2; AMD 速龙 X2 双核; AMD 速龙 X4; AMD 速龙 XP; AMD 速龙 neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD 羿龙; AMD 羿龙 FX; AMD 羿龙 II X2; AMD 羿龙 II X3; AMD 羿龙 II X4; AMD 羿龙 II X6; AMD 羿龙 II X8; AMD 羿龙 II 双核移动; AMD 羿龙 II 四核移动; AMD 羿龙 II 三核移动; AMD 羿龙 X3; AMD 羿龙 X4; AMD 锐龙 3 第 2 代; AMD 锐龙 3 第 3 代; AMD 锐龙 5; AMD 锐龙 5 第 2 代; AMD 锐龙 5 第 3 代; AMD 锐龙 5 第 5 代; AMD 锐龙 7; AMD 锐龙 7 第 2 代; AMD 锐龙 7 第 3 代; AMD 锐龙 7 第 5 代; AMD 锐龙 7 第 7 代; AMD 锐龙 9 第 3 代; AMD 锐龙 9 第 5 代; AMD 锐龙 9 第 7 代; AMD 锐龙线程撕裂者; AMD 锐龙线程撕裂者第 2 代; AMD 锐龙线程撕裂者第 3 代; AMD 锐龙线程撕裂者 Pro 第 3 代; AMD 闪龙; AMD 炫龙 64 X2 双核; AMD 炫龙 II Neo; AMD 炫龙 X2 Ultra 双核; 英特尔赛扬双核; 英特尔凌动; 英特尔赛扬; 英特尔赛扬 D; 英特尔赛扬 E; 英特尔赛扬 G; 英特尔赛扬 M; 英特尔赛扬 N; 英特尔酷睿 2 双核; 英特尔酷睿 2 至尊; 英特尔酷睿 2 四核; 英特尔酷睿 X 系列; 英特尔酷睿双核; 英特尔酷睿 i3; 英特尔酷睿 i5; 英特尔酷睿 i7; 英特尔酷睿 i7 至尊版; 英特尔酷睿 i9; 英特尔酷睿 i9 至尊版; 英特尔酷睿单核; 英特尔安腾; 英特尔奔腾; 英特尔奔腾 4; 英特尔奔腾 4 至尊版; 英特尔奔腾 D; 英特尔奔腾 G; 英特尔奔腾 III; 英特尔奔腾 M; 英特尔奔腾双核; 英特尔奔腾至尊版; 英特尔奔腾 Gold; 英特尔 x99; 英特尔至强; 英特尔至强 E; 英特尔至强 E3; 英特尔至强 E5; 英特尔至强融核; 英特尔至强 W; 不支持; VIA C3; VIA C7; 威盛 V4; VIA Luke; 威盛 nano; 其他
it: Serie di processori compatibili: AMD; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Non supportata; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Altro
fi: Yhteensopiva suoritinsarja: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Ei tuettu; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Muu
nl: Compatibele processorreeks: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobiel; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobiel; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobiel; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Niet ondersteund; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Andere
ko: 호환 가능한 프로세서 시리즈: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II 듀얼 코어; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 듀얼 코어; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II 듀얼 코어 모바일; AMD Phenom II 쿼드 코어 모바일; AMD Phenom II 트리플 코어 모바일; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2세대; AMD Ryzen 3 3세대; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2세대; AMD Ryzen 5 3세대; AMD Ryzen 5 5세대; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2세대; AMD Ryzen 7 3세대; AMD Ryzen 7 5세대; AMD Ryzen 7 7세대; AMD Ryzen 9 3세대; AMD Ryzen 9 5세대; AMD Ryzen 9 7세대; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2세대; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3세대; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3세대; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 듀얼 코어; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra 듀얼 코어; 인텔 셀러론 듀얼 코어; 인텔 아톰; 인텔 셀러론; 인텔 셀러론 D; 인텔 셀러론 E; 인텔 셀러론 G; 인텔 셀러론 M; 인텔 셀러론 N; 인텔 코어 2 듀오; 인텔 코어 2 익스트림; 인텔 코어 2 쿼드; 인텔 코어 X 시리즈; 인텔 코어 듀오; 인텔 코어 i3; 인텔 코어 i5; 인텔 코어 i7; 인텔 코어 i7 익스트림 에디션; 인텔 코어 i9; 인텔 코어 i9 익스트림 에디션; 인텔 코어 솔로; 인텔 아이태니엄; 인텔 펜티엄; 인텔 펜티엄 4; 인텔 펜티엄 4 익스트림 에디션; 인텔 펜티엄 D; 인텔 펜티엄 G; 인텔 펜티엄 III; 인텔 펜티엄 M; 인텔 펜티엄 듀얼 코어; 인텔 펜티엄 익스트림 에디션; 인텔 펜티엄 골드; 인텔 x99; 인텔 제온; 인텔 제온 E; 인텔 제온 E3; 인텔 제온 E5; 인텔 제온 Phi; 인텔 제온 W; 지원되지 않음; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; 기타
tr: Uyumlu İşlemci Serisi: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II çift çekirdekli; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 çift çekirdekli; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II çift çekirdekli mobil; AMD Phenom II dört çekirdekli mobil; AMD Phenom II üç çekirdekli mobil; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. nesil; AMD Ryzen 3 3. nesil; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. nesil; AMD Ryzen 5 3. nesil; AMD Ryzen 5 5. nesil; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. nesil; AMD Ryzen 7 3. nesil; AMD Ryzen 7 5. nesil; AMD Ryzen 7 7. nesil; AMD Ryzen 9 3. nesil; AMD Ryzen 9 5. nesil; AMD Ryzen 9 7. nesil; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. nesil; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. nesil; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. nesil; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 çift çekirdekli; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra çift çekirdekli; Intel Celeron çift çekirdekli; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X serisi; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme sürümü; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme sürümü; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme sürümü; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium çift çekirdekli; Intel pentium extreme sürümü; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Desteklenmiyor; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Diğer
vi: Dòng bộ xử lý tương thích: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II Dual-Core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 Dual-Core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon Neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II lõi kép cho di động; AMD Phenom II lõi tứ cho di động; AMD Phenom II lõi ba cho di động; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 thế hệ thứ 2; AMD Ryzen 3 thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 thế hệ thứ 2; AMD Ryzen 5 thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Ryzen 5 thế hệ thứ 5; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 thế hệ thứ 2; AMD Ryzen 7 thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Ryzen 7 thế hệ thứ 5; AMD Ryzen 7 thế hệ thứ 7; AMD Ryzen 9 thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Ryzen 9 thế hệ thứ 5; AMD Ryzen 9 thế hệ thứ 7; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper thế hệ thứ 2; AMD Ryzen Threadripper thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro thế hệ thứ 3; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 lõi kép; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra lõi kép; Intel Celeron lõi kép; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Chuỗi Intel Core X; Intel Core Quo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Phiên bản Cực cấp; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Phiên bản Cực cấp; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Phiên bản Cực cấp; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium lõi kép; Intel Pentium Phiên bản Cực cấp; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Không hỗ trợ; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Khác
ro-RO: Serie de procesoare compatibile: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Neacceptat; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Altele
bg-BG: Съвместима серия процесори: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; Двуядрен AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; Двуядрен AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; Двуядрен мобилен процесор AMD Phenom II; Четириядрен мобилен процесор AMD Phenom II; Триядрен мобилен процесор AMD Phenom II; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2-ро поколение; AMD Ryzen 3 3-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2-ро поколение; AMD Ryzen 5 3-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 5 5-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2-ро поколение; AMD Ryzen 7 3-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 7 5-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 7 7-мо поколение; AMD Ryzen 9 3-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 9 5-то поколение; AMD Ryzen 9 7-мо поколение; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2-ро поколение; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3-то поколение; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3-то поколение; AMD Sempron; Двуядрен процесор AMD Turion 64 X2; AMD Turion II neo; Двуядрен процесор AMD Turion X2 ultra; Двуядрен Intel Celeron; Intel atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel Core 2 extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 extreme edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Не се поддържа; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Други
zh-TW: 相容處理器系列: AMD A; AMD 速龍; AMD 速龍 FX; AMD 速龍 II; AMD 速龍 II X2; AMD 速龍 II X3; AMD 速龍 II X4; AMD 速龍 II 雙核心; AMD 速龍 MP; AMD 速龍 X2; AMD 速龍 II 雙核心; AMD 速龍 X4; AMD 速龍 XP; AMD 速龍 Neo X2; AMD C; AMD 鑽龍; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD 皓龍; AMD 飛龍; AMD 飛龍 FX; AMD 飛龍 II X2; AMD 飛龍 II X3; AMD 飛龍 II X4; AMD 飛龍 II X6; AMD 飛龍 II X8; AMD 飛龍 II 雙核心手機; AMD 飛龍 II 四核心手機; AMD 飛龍 II 三核心手機; AMD 飛龍 X3; AMD 飛龍 X4; AMD Ryzen 3 第二代; AMD Ryzen 3 第三代; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 第二代; AMD Ryzen 5 第三代; AMD Ryzen 5 第五代; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 第二代; AMD Ryzen 7 第三代; AMD Ryzen 7 第五代; AMD Ryzen 7 第七代; AMD Ryzen 9 第三代; AMD Ryzen 9 第五代; AMD Ryzen 9 第七代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 第二代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 第三代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 第三代; AMD 閃龍; AMD 炫龍 64 X2 雙核心; AMD 炫龍 II Neo; AMD 炫龍 X2 超雙核心; 英特爾賽揚雙核心; 英特爾凌動; Intel celeron; 英特爾賽揚 D; 英特爾賽揚 E; 英特爾賽揚 G; 英特爾賽揚 M; 英特爾賽揚 N; 英特爾酷睿 2 雙核心; 英特爾酷睿 2 極致版; 英特爾酷睿 2 四核心; 英特爾酷睿 X 系列; 英特爾酷睿雙核; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; 英特爾酷睿i7 極致版; Intel core i9; 英特爾酷睿i9 極致版; 英特爾酷睿單核心; 英特爾安騰; Intel pentium; 英特爾奔騰 4; 英特爾奔騰 4 極致版; 英特爾奔騰 D; 英特爾奔騰 G; 英特爾奔騰 III; 英特爾奔騰 M; 英特爾奔騰雙核心; 英特爾奔騰 極致版; 英特爾奔騰黃金級; 英特爾 x99; Intel xeon; 英特爾至強 E; 英特爾至強 E3; 英特爾至強 E5; 英特爾至強融核; 英特爾至強 W; 不支援; 威盛 C3; 威盛 C7; 威盛 V4; VIA Luke; 威盛凌瓏; 其他
sv: Kompatibel processorserie: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobil; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobil; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobil; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2:a generation; AMD Ryzen 3 3:e generation; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2:a generation; AMD Ryzen 5 3:e generation; AMD Ryzen 5 5:e generation; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2:a generation; AMD Ryzen 7 3:e generation; AMD Ryzen 7 5:e generation; AMD Ryzen 7 7:e generation; AMD Ryzen 9 3:e generation; AMD Ryzen 9 5:e generation; AMD Ryzen 9 7:e generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2:a generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3:e generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3:e generation; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-serien; Intel kärnduo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium guld; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Stöds inte; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Annat
pt-PT: Série de processadores compatíveis: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II Dual-Core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 Dual-Core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II Dual-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Quad-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Triple-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 de 2.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 3 de 3.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 de 2.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 5 de 3.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 5 de 5.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 de 2.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 7 de 3.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 7 de 5.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 7 de 7.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 9 de 3.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 9 de 5.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen 9 de 7.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper de 2.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper de 3.ª Geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro de 3.ª Geração; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 Dual-Core; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra Dual-Core; Intel Celeron Dual-Core; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quádruplo; Intel Core série X; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium Dual-Core; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Não suportado; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinama procesorių serija: AMD A; „AMD Athlon“; „AMD Athlon FX“; „AMD Athlon II“; „AMD Athlon II X2“; „AMD Athlon II X3“; „AMD Athlon II X4“; „AMD Athlon II dual-core“ dviejų branduolių; „AMD Athlon MP“; „AMD Athlon X2“; „AMD Athlon X2“ dviejų branduolių; „AMD Athlon X4“; „AMD Athlon XP“; „AMD Athlon neo X2“; AMD C; „AMD Duron“; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; „AMD FreeSync“; „AMD Geode“; „AMD Opteron“; „AMD Phenom“; „AMD Phenom FX“; „AMD Phenom II X2“; „AMD Phenom II X3“; „AMD Phenom II X4“; „AMD Phenom II X6“; „AMD Phenom II X8“; „AMD Phenom II“ dviejų branduolių mobilusis; „AMD Phenom II“ keturių branduolių mobilusis; „AMD Phenom II“ trijų branduolių mobilusis; „AMD Phenom X3“; „AMD Phenom X4“; „AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 5“; „AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen“; „AMD Ryzen 7“; „AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen“; „AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen“; „AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen“; „AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen“; „AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen“; „AMD Ryzen Threadripper“; „AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen“; „AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen“; „AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen“; „AMD Sempron“; „AMD Turion 64 X2“ dviejų branduolių; „AMD Turion II neo“; „AMD Turion X2 Ultra“ dviejų branduolių; „Intel Celeron“ dviejų branduolių; „Intel Atom“; „Intel Celeron“; „Intel Celeron D“; „Intel Celeron E“; „Intel Celeron G“; „Intel Celeron M“; „Intel Celeron N“; „Intel core 2 duo“; „Intel core 2 extreme“; „Intel core 2 quad“; „Intel core X-series“; „Intel core 2 duo“; „Intel core i3“; „Intel core i5“; „Intel core i7“; „Intel core i7 Extreme Edition“; „Intel core i9“; „Intel core i9 Extreme Edition“; „Intel core solo“; „Intel Itanium“; „Intel Pentium“; „Intel Pentium 4“; „Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition“; „Intel Pentium D“; „Intel Pentium G“; „Intel Pentium III“; „Intel Pentium M“; „Intel Pentium“ dviejų branduolių; „Intel Pentium Extreme Edition“; „Intel Pentium Gold“; „Intel x99“; „Intel Xeon“; „Intel Xeon E“; „Intel Xeon E3“; „Intel Xeon E5“; „Intel Xeon Phi“; „Intel Xeon W“; Nepalaikoma; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; „VIA luke“; „VIA nano“; Kita
es: Serie de procesadores compatibles: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II de doble núcleo; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 de doble núcleo; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II móvil de doble núcleo; AMD Phenom II móvil de cuatro núcleos; AMD Phenom II móvil de tres núcleos; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 de 2da generación; AMD Ryzen 3 de 3ra generación; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 de 2da generación; AMD Ryzen 5 de 3ra generación; AMD Ryzen 5 de 5ta generación; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 de 2da generación; AMD Ryzen 7 de 3ra generación; AMD Ryzen 7 de 5ta generación; AMD Ryzen 7 de 7ma generación; AMD Ryzen 9 de 3ra generación; AMD Ryzen 9 de 5ta generación; AMD Ryzen 9 de 7ma generación; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper de 2da generación; AMD Ryzen Threadripper de 3ra generación; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro de 3ra generación; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 de doble núcleo; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra de doble núcleo; Intel Celeron de doble núcleo; Intel Atom; Intel celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-series; Intel Core Duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium de doble núcleo; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel X99; Intel xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; No compatible; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Otros
el: Συμβατή σειρά επεξεργαστών: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core X-series; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Δεν υποστηρίζεται; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Άλλο
ja: 互換性のあるプロセッサーシリーズ: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon IIデュアルコア; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2デュアルコア; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom IIデュアルコアモバイル; AMD Phenom IIクアッドコアモバイル; AMD Phenom IIトリプルコアモバイル; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3第2世代; AMD Ryzen 3第3世代; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5第2世代; AMD Ryzen 5第3世代; AMD Ryzen 5第5世代; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7第2世代; AMD Ryzen 7第3世代; AMD Ryzen 7第5世代; AMD Ryzen 7第7世代; AMD Ryzen 9第3世代; AMD Ryzen 9第5世代; AMD Ryzen 9第7世代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper第2世代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper第3世代; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro第3世代; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2デュアルコア; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultraデュアルコア; インテルCeleronデュアルコア; インテルatom; インテルceleron; インテルceleron D; インテルceleron E; インテルceleron G; インテルceleron M; インテルceleron N; インテルcore 2 duo; インテルcore 2 extreme; インテルcore 2 quad; インテルcore X-シリーズ; インテルcore duo; インテルcore i3; インテルcore i5; インテルcore i7; インテルcore i7エクストリームエディション; インテルcore i9; インテルcore i9エクストリームエディション; インテルcore solo; インテルitanium; インテルpentium; インテルpentium 4; インテルpentium 4エクストリームエディション; インテルpentium D; インテルpentium G; インテルpentium III; インテルpentium M; インテルpentiumデュアルコア; インテルpentiumエクストリームエディション; インテルpentium gold; インテルx99; インテルxeon; インテルxeon E; インテルxeon E3; インテルxeon E5; インテルxeon Phi; インテルxeon W; 非対応; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIAルーク; VIA nano; その他
cs: Kompatibilní řada procesorů: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II Dual-Core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 Dual-Core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II Dual-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Quad-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Triple-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. generace; AMD Ryzen 3 3. generace; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. generace; AMD Ryzen 5 3. generace; AMD Ryzen 5 5. generace; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. generace; AMD Ryzen 7 3. generace; AMD Ryzen 7 5. generace; AMD Ryzen 7 7. generace; AMD Ryzen 9 3. generace; AMD Ryzen 9 5. generace; AMD Ryzen 9 7. generace; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. generace; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. generace; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. generace; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 Dual-Core; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra Dual-Core; Intel Celeron Dual-Core; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X Series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium Dual-Core; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel X99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel XE5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Nepodporováno; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Jiné
da: Kompatibel processorserie: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-serien; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Ikke understøttet; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Andet
pt-BR: Série de processadores compatíveis: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2ª geração; AMD Ryzen 3 3ª geração; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2ª geração; AMD Ryzen 5 3ª geração; AMD Ryzen 5 5ª geração; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2ª geração; AMD Ryzen 7 3ª geração; AMD Ryzen 7 5ª geração; AMD Ryzen 7 7ª geração; AMD Ryzen 9 3ª geração; AMD Ryzen 9 5ª geração; AMD Ryzen 9 7ª geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2ª geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3ª geração; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3ª geração; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel Celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel Core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Não compatível; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Outro
ru: Совместимые серии процессоров: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II Dual-Core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 Dual-Core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon Neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II Dual-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Quad-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Triple-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 3 3-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 5 3-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 5 5-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 7 3-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 7 5-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 7 7-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 9 3-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 9 5-го поколения; AMD Ryzen 9 7-го поколения; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2-го поколения; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3-го поколения; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3-го поколения; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 Dual-Core; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra Dual-Core; Intel Celeron Dual-Core; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-Series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium Dual-Core; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Не поддерживается; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilna serija procesora: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dvojezgreni; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dvojezgreni; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon Neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dvojezgreni mobilni; AMD Phenom II četverojezgreni mobilni; AMD Phenom II trojezgreni mobilni; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 druge generacije; AMD Ryzen 3 treće generacije; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 druge generacije; AMD Ryzen 5 treće generacije; AMD Ryzen 5 pete generacije; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 druge generacije; AMD Ryzen 7 treće generacije; AMD Ryzen 7 pete generacije; AMD Ryzen 7 sedme generacije; AMD Ryzen 9 treće generacije; AMD Ryzen 9 pete generacije; AMD Ryzen 9 sedme generacije; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper druge generacije; AMD Ryzen Threadripper treće generacije; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro treće generacije; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dvojezgreni; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra dvojezgreni; Intel Celeron dvojezgreni; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-Series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium dvojezgreni; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Nije podržano; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Ostalo
de: Kompatible Prozessorserien: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II Dual-Core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 Dual-Core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon Neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II Dual-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Quad-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom II Triple-Core Mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. Generation; AMD Ryzen 3 3. Generation; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. Generation; AMD Ryzen 5 3. Generation; AMD Ryzen 5 5. Generation; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. Generation; AMD Ryzen 7 3. Generation; AMD Ryzen 7 5. Generation; AMD Ryzen 7 7. Generation; AMD Ryzen 9 3. Generation; AMD Ryzen 9 5. Generation; AMD Ryzen 9 7. Generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. Generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. Generation; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. Generation; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 Dual-Core; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra Dual-Core; Intel Celeron Dual-Core; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-Series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium Dual-Core; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Nicht unterstützt; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Sonstiges
th: ซีรีส์ผู้ประมวลผลที่รองรับ: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; ไม่รองรับ; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljiva serija procesorjev: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel Core X-serija; Intel core duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel Core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Ni podprto; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Drugo
fr: Série de processeur compatible: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II double cœur; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Optéron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II FX3; AMD Phenom II FX4; AMD Phenom II FX6; AMD Phenom II FX8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom FX4; AMD Ryzen 3 2e génération; AMD Ryzen 3 3e génération; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2e génération; AMD Ryzen 5 3e génération; AMD Ryzen 5 5e génération; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2e génération; AMD Ryzen 7 3e génération; AMD Ryzen 7 5e génération; AMD Ryzen 7 7e génération; AMD Ryzen 9 3e génération; AMD Ryzen 9 5e génération; AMD Ryzen 9 7e génération; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2e génération; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3e génération; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3e génération; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II néo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel Atome; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core série X; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 édition extrême; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 édition extrême; Intel core solo; Intel titane; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 édition extrême; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium dual-core; Intel Pentium édition extrême; Intel Pentium D; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Non pris en charge; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Autre
pl: Zgodna seria procesorów: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; Dwurdzeniowy AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; Dwurdzeniowy AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; Dwurdzeniowy mobilny AMD Phenom II; Czterordzeniowy mobilny AMD Phenom II; Trzyrdzeniowy mobilny AMD Phenom II; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. generacji; AMD Ryzen 3 3. generacji; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. generacji; AMD Ryzen 5 3. generacji; AMD Ryzen 5 5. generacji; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. generacji; AMD Ryzen 7 3. generacji; AMD Ryzen 7 5. generacji; AMD Ryzen 7 7. generacji; AMD Ryzen 9 3. generacji; AMD Ryzen 9 5. generacji; AMD Ryzen 9 7. generacji; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. generacji; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. generacji; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. generacji; AMD Sempron; Dwurdzeniowy AMD Turion 64 X2; AMD Turion II neo; Dwurdzeniowy AMD Turion X2 ultra; Dwurdzeniowy Intel Celeron; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core z serii X; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Dwurdzeniowy Intel pentium; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Nieobsługiwane; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Pozostałe
en: Compatible processor series: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Not supported; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA luke; VIA nano; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilný rad procesorov: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; Dvojjadrový procesor AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; Dvojjadrový procesor AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; Dvojjadrový procesor AMD Phenom II pre mobilný telefón; Štvorjadrový procesor AMD Phenom II pre mobilný telefón; Trojjadrový procesor AMD Phenom II pre mobilný telefón; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5. gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3. gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3. gen; AMD Sempron; Dvojjadrový procesor AMD Turion 64 X2; AMD Turion II neo; Ultra dvojjadrový procesor AMD Turion X2; Dvojjadrový Intel Celeron; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel Core 2 duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 quad; Intel Core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel Core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Dvojjadrový procesor Intel pentium; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Nie je podporované; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis processzorsorozat: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II, kétmagos; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2, kétmagos; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon Neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II, kétmagos, mobil; AMD Phenom II, négymagos, mobil; AMD Phenom II, hárommagos, mobil; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3, 2. generációs; AMD Ryzen 3, 3. generációs; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5, 2. generációs; AMD Ryzen 5, 3. generációs; AMD Ryzen 5, 5. generációs; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7, 2. generációs; AMD Ryzen 7, 3. generációs; AMD Ryzen 7, 5. generációs; AMD Ryzen 7, 7. generációs; AMD Ryzen 9, 3. generációs; AMD Ryzen 9, 5. generációs; AMD Ryzen 9, 7. generációs; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper, 2. generációs; AMD Ryzen Threadripper, 3. generációs; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro, 3. generációs; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2, kétmagos; AMD Turion II Neo; AMD Turion X2 Ultra, kétmagos; Intel Celeron, kétmagos; Intel Atom; Intel Celeron; Intel Celeron D; Intel Celeron E; Intel Celeron G; Intel Celeron M; Intel Celeron N; Intel Core 2 Duo; Intel Core 2 Extreme; Intel Core 2 Quad; Intel Core X-series; Intel Core Duo; Intel Core i3; Intel Core i5; Intel Core i7; Intel Core i7 Extreme Edition; Intel Core i9; Intel Core i9 Extreme Edition; Intel Core Solo; Intel Itanium; Intel Pentium; Intel Pentium 4; Intel Pentium 4 Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium D; Intel Pentium G; Intel Pentium III; Intel Pentium M; Intel Pentium, kétmagos; Intel Pentium Extreme Edition; Intel Pentium Gold; Intel x99; Intel Xeon; Intel Xeon E; Intel Xeon E3; Intel Xeon E5; Intel Xeon Phi; Intel Xeon W; Nem támogatott; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA Nano; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel prosessorserie: AMD A; AMD Athlon; AMD Athlon FX; AMD Athlon II; AMD Athlon II X2; AMD Athlon II X3; AMD Athlon II X4; AMD Athlon II dual-core; AMD Athlon MP; AMD Athlon X2; AMD Athlon X2 dual-core; AMD Athlon X4; AMD Athlon XP; AMD Athlon neo X2; AMD C; AMD Duron; AMD E; AMD E2; AMD EPYC; AMD EPYC 7000; AMD EPYC 7002; AMD FX; AMD FreeSync; AMD Geode; AMD Opteron; AMD Phenom; AMD Phenom FX; AMD Phenom II X2; AMD Phenom II X3; AMD Phenom II X4; AMD Phenom II X6; AMD Phenom II X8; AMD Phenom II dual-core mobile; AMD Phenom II quad-core mobile; AMD Phenom II triple-core mobile; AMD Phenom X3; AMD Phenom X4; AMD Ryzen 3 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 3 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5; AMD Ryzen 5 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 5 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7; AMD Ryzen 7 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 7 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 7 7th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen 9 5th gen; AMD Ryzen 9 7th gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 2nd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper 3rd gen; AMD Ryzen Threadripper Pro 3rd gen; AMD Sempron; AMD Turion 64 X2 dual-core; AMD Turion II neo; AMD Turion X2 ultra dual-core; Intel Celeron dual-core; Intel atom; Intel celeron; Intel celeron D; Intel celeron E; Intel celeron G; Intel celeron M; Intel celeron N; Intel core 2 duo; Intel core 2 extreme; Intel core 2 quad; Intel core X-series; Intel core duo; Intel core i3; Intel core i5; Intel core i7; Intel core i7 extreme edition; Intel core i9; Intel core i9 extreme edition; Intel core solo; Intel itanium; Intel pentium; Intel pentium 4; Intel pentium 4 extreme edition; Intel pentium D; Intel pentium G; Intel pentium III; Intel pentium M; Intel pentium dual-core; Intel pentium extreme edition; Intel pentium gold; Intel x99; Intel xeon; Intel xeon E; Intel xeon E3; Intel xeon E5; Intel xeon Phi; Intel xeon W; Ikke støttet; VIA C3; VIA C7; VIA V4; VIA Luke; VIA nano; Annen